Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 1. Interstate Compact on Juveniles
This compact (prior law) does not restrain application of the specific terminology of the criminal transfer provisions (§

14-6-203

) of the Juvenile Code. Menapace v. State, 768 P.2d 8,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Treatment, under Federal Juvenile Delinquency Act (18 USCS §§ 5031-5042), of juvenile alleged to have violated law of United States, 137 ALR Fed 481.